Hawaii, session 2025, SB1596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there is currently one location in the State for newly graduated nursing students to take the National Council Licensure Examination (NCLEX) administered by Pearson Education, Inc., to get their license.  The limitation of the testing site places a significant burden on many new graduates who are requested to pay for lodging, travel, and other related costs to take the test on Oahu. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the department of health to establish one Pearson VUE Authorized Test Center in each of the counties of Hawaii, Kauai, and Maui to offer and expand the testing availability of the NCLEX for nurses. SECTION 2. (a)  The department of health shall: (1)  Identify one facility in each of the counties of Hawaii, Kauai, and Maui that has the capability to establish a Pearson VUE Authorized Test Center; (2)  Equip each facility identified in paragraph (1) with the technical and facility requirements necessary for a Pearson VUE Authorized Test Center; and (3)  No later than         , submit an application for each facility identified and equipped with the technical and facility requirements pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) to Pearson Education, Inc. to be authorized and contracted as a Pearson VUE Authorized Test Center. (b) The department shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of      . (c)  For the purposes of this section: "Department" means the department of health. "Pearson Education, Inc." refers to the educational publishing and services subsidiary of the international corporation Pearson plc. "Pearson VUE Authorized Test Center" refers to a test center contracted and authorized by Pearson Education, Inc. to offer certification exams. "Technical and facility requirements" means the requirements listed on the application for a Pearson VUE Authorized Test Center as posted on the website of Pearson Education, Inc. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________